Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-102
Director of the Nebraska State Historical Society; report; contents.

The Director of the Nebraska State Historical Society shall deliver a biennial report to the Governor. Each such report shall include the transactions and expenditures of the society, together with all historical addresses that have been read before the society during the preceding two years or that furnish historical matter on data of the state.

Laws 1883, c. 95, § 2, p. 340;

R.S.1913, § 7167;

C.S.1922, § 6818;

C.S.1929, § 82-102;

R.S.1943, § 82-102;

Laws 1955, c. 231, § 21, p. 728;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 38;

Laws 2024, LB1169, § 5.
July 19, 2024